en: Chocolate puffed rice
fr: Riz soufflé chocolaté, Riz soufflé au chocolat
hr: Čokoladna lisnata riža
it: Riso soffiato al cioccolato
lt: Pūsti šokoladiniai ryžiai

en: Chocolate puffed rice not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Chocolate popped rice not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Riz soufflé chocolaté non enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Čokoladna lisnata riža koja nije obogaćena vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Pūsti šokoladiniai ryžiai nepapildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Chocolate puffed rice fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Chocolate popped rice fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Riz soufflé chocolaté enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Čokoladna lisnata riža obogaćena vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Pūsti šokoladiniai ryžiai papildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Puffed rice fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Popped rice fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Riz soufflé nature enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Lisnatu rižu obogaćenu vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Pūsti ryžiai papildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Puffed rye
es: Centeno inflado, Centeno hinchado
fr: Seigle soufflé
hr: Napuhana raž
lt: Pūsti rugiai
nl: Gepofte rogge

en: Puffed spelt
de: Puffdinkel
es: Espelta inflada, Espelta hinchada
fr: Épeautre soufflé
hr: Puffed pir
it: Farro soffiato
lt: Pūstos speltos
nl: Gepofte spelt

en: Plain puffed spelt
fr: Épeautre soufflé nature

en: Chocolate puffed spelt
fr: Épeautre soufflé chocolaté

en: Honey puffed spelt
fr: Épeautre soufflé au miel

en: Puffed wheat
es: Trigo inflado, Trigo hinchado
fr: Blé soufflé
hr: Nabujala pšenica
it: Grano soffiato
lt: Pūsti kviečiai
nl: Gepofte tarwe

en: Puffed Khorasan wheat, Puffed Kamut, Wholemeal puffed khorasan wheat, Wholemeal popped khorasan wheat
es: Trigo de Jorasán inflado, Trigo de Jorasán hinchado, Kamut inflado, Kamut hinchado
fr: Blé de khorasan soufflé, Blé khorasan complet soufflé
hr: Puffed khorasan pšenica
nl: Gepofte Khorosan

en: Plain puffed wheat
fr: Blé soufflé nature

en: Sweetened puffed wheat
fr: Blé soufflé sucré

en: Chocolate puffed wheat, Chocolate puffed wheat grains
fr: Blé soufflé chocolaté, Grains de blé soufflés chocolatés, Grains de blé soufflés au chocolat
hr: Čokoladna lisnata pšenica
lt: Pūsti šokoladiniai kviečių grūdai

en: Chocolate puffed wheat grains fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Chocolate popped wheat grains fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Grains de blé soufflés chocolatés enrichis en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Čokoladna napuhana zrna pšenice obogaćena vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Pūsti kviečių grūdai papildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Puffed wheat with honey, Popped wheat grain with honey
fr: Blé soufflé au miel, Grains de blé soufflés au miel

en: Popped wheat grain with honey fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Puffed wheat grain with honey fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Grains de blé soufflés au miel enrichis en vitamines et minéraux

en: Puffed wheat with caramel, Popped wheat grain with caramel
fr: Blé soufflé au caramel, Grains de blé soufflés au caramel

en: Popped wheat grain with caramel fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Puffed wheat grain with caramel fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Grains de blé soufflés au caramel enrichis en vitamines et minéraux

en: Cereal flours
bg: Зърнени брашна
ca: Farines de cereal
de: Getreidemehle
es: Harinas de cereales
fi: Viljajauhot
fr: Farines de céréales
he: קמחי דגנים
hr: Brašna od žitarica
hu: Gabona lisztek
it: Farine di cereali
lt: Javų miltai
nl: Melen van graan
pl: Mąki zbożowe, Mąki ze zbóż
pt: Farinhas de cereais
ru: крупяная мука